Maryland, session 2025, SB0395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 9. MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECTS.
2–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT” MEANS THE MEASUREMENT OF A
GIVEN WEIGHT OF A GREENHOUSE GAS THAT HAS THE SAME GLOBAL WARMING
POTENTIAL, MEASURED OVER A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME, AS 1 METRIC TON OF
CARBON DIOXIDE.
(C) “GREENHOUSE GAS” INCLUDES CARBON DIOXIDE, METHANE, NITROUS
OXIDE, HYDROFLUOROCARBONS, PERFLUOROCARBONS, AND SULFUR
HEXAFLUORIDE.
(D) “GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS” MEANS EMISSIONS OF GREENHOUSE
GASES IN THE STATE, MEASURED IN METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE
EQUIVALENTS.
(E) “IMPACT ASSESSMENT” MEANS AN ASSESSMENT OF A PROJECT’S OR
PROGRAM’S IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES
TRAVELED.
(F) “INDUCED DEMAND” MEANS THE VOLUME OF TRAFFIC THAT IS DRAWN
TO A NEW OR EXPANDED ROAD BY PROVIDING ADDITIONAL CAPACITY, INCLUDING
FROM:
(1) TRIPS DIVERTED FROM OTHER ROUTES;
(2) DISCRETIONARY TRIPS THAT MAY NOT HAVE BEEN MADE
WITHOUT IMPROVEMENT; AND
(3) IMPROVED ACCESS TO EMPLOYMENT AND OTHER ACTIVITY
LOCATION CHOICES.
(G) “MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–103.1 OF
THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 395 3
(H) “MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT” MEANS A MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECT THAT:
(1) THROUGH ALL PHASES INCREASES HIGHWAY CAPACITY
THROUGH NEW HIGHWAY LANES OR EXTENDED HIGHWAY LANES; AND
(2) HAS A TOTAL COST FOR ALL PHASES THAT EXCEEDS $5,000,000.
(I) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–701
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(J) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–701 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(K) “VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA” MEANS THE TOTAL NUMBER
OF ON–ROAD MILES TRAVELED BY VEHICLES IN A GEOGRAPHIC REGION OVER A
1–YEAR PERIOD DIVIDED BY THE POPULATION IN THAT REGION.
2–902.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION
PROJECT THAT ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, WAS:
(1) A PART OF THE STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM; OR
(2) FUNDED FOR CONSTRUCTION IN THE CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM.
2–903.
(A) AS PART OF THE PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A MAJOR
HIGHWAY EXPANSION PROJECT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND
IMPLEMENT A CORRESPONDING MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM FOR
THE PROPOSED HIGHWAY CORRIDOR EXPANSION.
(B) (1) DURING DEVELOPMENT OF THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY
EXPANSION PROJECT, THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL IDENTIFY INVESTMENTS IN
TRANSIT, TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, TRANSPORTATION DEMAND
MANAGEMENT, PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES, LAND USE CHANGES, AND
OTHER MEASURES TO OFFSET THE INCREASE IN VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED
ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT.

SENATE BILL 395
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL FOCUS ON AREAS IN THE FOLLOWING
ORDER OF PRIORITY:
(I) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT;
(II) AREAS WITHIN OR ASSOCIATED WITH AT LEAST ONE OF THE
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE PROJECT;
(III) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES ACROSS THE STATE;
(IV) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IN THE REGION IN WHICH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY
EXPANSION PROJECT IS LOCATED; AND
(V) BENEFITS TO THE ENTIRE STATE.
(C) (1) THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL OFFSET
THE VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED ASSOCIATED WITH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY
EXPANSION PROJECT.
(2) THE NET VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED FROM THE PROJECT AND ITS
ASSOCIATED MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL EQUAL ZERO OR A
NUMBER LESS THAN ZERO.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER BOTH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY
CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT AND THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION OFFSET
PROGRAM AS PART OF ITS EVALUATION OF THE PROJECT UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS
TITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FUND ELEMENTS OF THE MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM CONCURRENTLY WITH FUNDING FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION OF THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT.
2–904.
(A) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECTS INCLUDED IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR THEIR IMPACT ON:

SENATE BILL 395 5
(I) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS; AND
(II) VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA.
(2) IF THE NET IMPACT OF A MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT IS AN
INCREASE IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS, THE STATE SHALL FUND OFFSETTING
ACTIVITIES TO REDUCE THE NET GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS TO ZERO OR A
NUMBER LESS THAN ZERO.
(3) THE EVALUATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PUBLISHED FOR THE DRAFT CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM BY OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, AND WITH THE FINAL
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM EACH YEAR.
(B) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACHIEVE, TO THE
MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND SUBJECT TO THE STATE BUDGET, A PROGRAM
WHOSE IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS IS CONSISTENT WITH, AND MAKES
PROGRESS TOWARD ACHIEVING GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION TARGETS
CONSISTENT WITH THE STATE’S CARBON POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN OVER THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY FUND OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES TO MAKE
THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM MORE CONSISTENT WITH THE
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS UNDER THE STATE’S CARBON
POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN OR TO INCREASE PROGRESS TOWARD THOSE GOALS.
(C) THE OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND
(B) OF THIS SECTION ARE ACTIVITIES THAT:
(1) DEMONSTRABLY CREATE CONSISTENT, LONG–TERM REDUCTIONS
IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS OR VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED;
(2) PRIORITIZE OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
AND
(3) INCLUDE:
(I) PARKING REDUCTION INITIATIVES;
(II) ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION;

SENATE BILL 395
(III) TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES;
(IV) LOW–TRAVEL–DEMAND COMMERCIAL AND RESIDENTIAL
DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER LAND USE CHANGES;
(V) ROADWAY PRICING;
(VI) TELECOMMUTING;
(VII) PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE IMPROVEMENTS AND
EXPANSION;
(VIII) MICRO–MOBILITY;
(IX) ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS THAT
COMPLY WITH THE AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT;
(X) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY GENERATION; AND
(XI) OTHER ACTIVITIES IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR
THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO REDUCE TRANSPORTATION
EMISSIONS.
(D) TO ACHIEVE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SET ANNUAL DECLINING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
REDUCTION TARGETS THAT INCORPORATE ASSUMPTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLES IN THE STATE.
(E) IN EVALUATING THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM’S
IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH THE BASELINE TOTAL GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO SURFACE TRANSPORTATION IN THE STATE FOR THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD;
(2) CONSIDER THE DIRECT AND INDUCED DEMAND IMPACTS OF
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECTS AND TRANSIT CAPITAL PROJECTS ON
VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;
(3) CONSIDER THE DIRECT BENEFITS OF INVESTMENTS IN:

SENATE BILL 395 7
(I) TRANSIT OPERATIONS, INCLUDING LOCALLY OPERATED
TRANSIT SYSTEMS;
(II) TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING LAND DEVELOPMENT
DESIGNED TO REDUCED TRAVEL DEMAND;
(III) PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE INFRASTRUCTURE;
(IV) ELECTRIFICATION OF STATE VEHICLES;
(V) VEHICLE CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(VI) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY GENERATION; AND
(4) COMPARE THE PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS TO THE
TARGET EMISSIONS ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
ACHIEVES THE EMISSIONS TARGETS.
(F) IN EVALUATING WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM MEETS GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION GOALS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT
CONSIDER STATE OF GOOD REPAIR ACTIVITIES AND ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SOLELY
FOR SYSTEM PRESERVATION.
2–905.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO PERFORM CAPACITY EXPANSION
IMPACT ASSESSMENTS;
(2) REQUIRE THE USE OF AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT IN THE
DETERMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–903 AND 2–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING BY ESTABLISHING:
(I) ANY NECESSARY POLICIES, PROCEDURES, MANUALS, AND
TECHNICAL SPECIFICATIONS;

SENATE BILL 395
(II) PROCEDURES TO PERFORM AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT THAT
PROVIDES FOR THE DETERMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–902 AND 2–903 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) CRITERIA FOR IDENTIFICATION OF A CAPACITY EXPANSION
PROJECT; AND
(IV) RELATED DATA REPORTING FROM LOCAL UNITS OF
GOVERNMENT ON LOCAL MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS AND LOCAL
PROJECT IMPACTS ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES
TRAVELED.
(B) AN ANALYSIS UNDER A CAPACITY EXPANSION IMPACT ASSESSMENT
SHALL INCLUDE ESTIMATES RESULTING FROM A PROJECT OR PORTFOLIO OF
PROJECTS FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(1) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS OVER A PERIOD OF 20 YEARS;
(2) A NET CHANGE IN VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED FOR THE AFFECTED
NETWORK; AND
(3) IMPACTS TO STATE HIGHWAYS AND RELATED IMPACTS TO LOCAL
ROAD SYSTEMS, ON A LOCAL, REGIONAL, OR STATEWIDE BASIS AS APPROPRIATE.
(C) THE ANALYSIS AND ESTIMATES SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED USING THE BEST AVAILABLE DATA AND
MODELING TOOLS, SUCH AS:
(1) THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR SUSTAINABLE TRANSPORTATION’S
INDUCED TRAVEL CALCULATOR;
(2) THE STATE HIGHWAY INDUCED FREQUENCY OF TRAVEL
CALCULATOR;
(3) THE CAMBRIDGE SYSTEMATICS TRANSPORTATION EFFICIENCY
AND CARBON REDUCTION TOOL; OR
(4) ANY OTHER IMPACT ASSESSMENT TOOL USED FOR MEASURING
INDUCED DEMAND FOR GRADE SEPARATION PROJECTS.
(D) IN FISCAL YEAR 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE FUNDING
FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION AND DEVELOPMENT OF STATEWIDE AND REGIONAL
TRAVEL DEMAND MODELING RELATED TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION,

SENATE BILL 395 9
INCLUDING INDUCED DEMAND AND LAND USE EFFECTS FROM TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENTS.
8–102.
(a) It is the policy of this title to promote an efficient and economical
transportation system.
(b) The Department [of Transportation] and the [State Highway] Administration
may not proceed to the final project planning phase unless it has been determined that the
objective of the proposed project cannot be reasonably achieved through:
(1) Improvements in highway maintenance and safety;
(2) Projects that modify existing highways but provide for minimal
relocation or new highway construction; and
(3) Improvements in, or adoption of, transit alternatives, including mass
transit alternatives.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ISSUE A REPORT
PRIOR TO PROCEEDING TO THE FINAL PROJECT PLANNING PHASE THAT
DOCUMENTS:
(1) THE EVALUATION OF THE ALTERNATIVES IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) A DETERMINATION THROUGH OTHER REQUIRED PLANNING
DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.